Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2125
State inspection; not applicable in certain political subdivisions; when; electrical inspector; certificate of qualification.

(1) State inspection shall not apply within the jurisdiction of any county, city, or village which provides by resolution or ordinance standards of electrical wiring and its installation that are not less than those prescribed by the board or by the State Electrical Act and which further provides by resolution or ordinance for the inspection of electrical installations within the limits of such subdivision by a certified electrical inspector. No person other than the holder of an electrical inspector's certificate of qualification shall be appointed to act as electrical inspector and to enforce the act as electrical inspector and to enforce the act or any applicable resolution or ordinance within his or her jurisdiction. A copy of the certificate of each electrical inspector shall be provided to the board by the political subdivision issuing the certificate.

(2) State inspection shall not apply to routine maintenance.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 25;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-595;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 22.